Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Definitions

§ 17-20-140.
General definitions.

As used in this act:

“Cooperative utility” means a corporation organized under any law of this state or under the law of any other jurisdiction, for a purpose other than the conduct of business for profit and includes, but is not limited to, corporations organized to own, operate and maintain electric, telephone and television distribution systems primarily to its members;

“Patronage capital contributions” means all funds received and receivable from members from the furnishing of cooperative utility services in excess of operating costs and expenses properly chargeable against the furnishing of cooperative utility services;

“This act” means W.S.

17-20-101

through

17-20-1801

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.